Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-921
Locomotive operators; conductors; intoxication; penalty.

Any person who is intoxicated while in charge of a locomotive running upon the track of any railroad or while acting as the conductor of a car or train of cars on any railroad shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 108, p. 227;

R.S.1913, § 6057;

C.S.1922, § 5414;

C.S.1929, § 74-706;

R.S.1943, § 74-706;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 188;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 74-706;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 21.